North Dakota, session 69, SB2357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - CREATION OF A COMPOSITE
MENTAL HEALTH LICENSING BOARD.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the
feasibility, benefits, and challenges of creating a composite mental health licensing
board. The study must include:
a. An evaluation of the impact of the creation of a composite mental health licensing
board to oversee the licensing, regulation, and disciplinary procedures for
psychologists, social workers, addiction counselors, professional counselors, and
marriage and family therapists;
b. A consideration of the addition of peer support certification and participation in
the composite mental health licensing board;
c. An analysis of the regulatory efficiencies that would result from the consolidation
of multiple independent licensing boards into a single entity;
d. A consideration of the fiscal impact that would result from the creation of a
composite mental health licensing board, including administrative consolidation,
fee structures, and operational efficiencies;
e. An analysis of the effects of the creation of a composite mental health licensing
board on licensing requirements, professional standards, and the disciplinary
processes, including the maintenance and improvement of current oversight;
Page No. 1 25.1301.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. A consideration of the perspectives of affected professionals, board members,
industry associations, and the public regarding the creation of a composite
mental health licensing board;
g. A consideration of the influence of a composite mental health licensing board on
the state's participation in professional licensure compacts, multistate practice
agreements, and workforce mobility;
h. A consideration of the impact of a composite mental health licensing board on the
availability of qualified mental health professionals and public access to mental
health care; and
i. A review of best practices from other states that have created similar composite
licensing boards.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth
legislative assembly.
Page No. 2 25.1301.02000